Massachusetts, session 194th, S1737.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
There shall be a standing commission on operating under the influence and impaired
driving established pursuant to section 2A of chapter 4 of the General Laws, referred to in this
section as the commission. The commission shall meet at least quarterly and shall review all
aspects of law enforcement personnel's ability to properly test impaired operators and prevent
impaired operation of motor vehicles and make any recommendations for improvements or
changes that the commission determines are necessary.
The commission shall consist of 13 members as follows: the secretary of public safety
and security or a designee, who shall serve as chair of the commission; the attorney general or a
designee; the colonel of the state police or a designee; the executive director of the
of 3

Massachusetts cannabis control commission or a designee; the president of Massachusetts Chiefs
of Police Association Incorporated or a designee; the president of the Massachusetts District
Attorney’s Association or a designee; the president of the Massachusetts Bar Association or a
designee; the president of the American Civil Liberties Union of Massachusetts, Inc. or a
designee; the chief executive officer of the AAA Southern New England or a designee, the
president of the NAACP New England Area Conference or a designee, the president of the
Massachusetts Medical Society or a designee; 1 person appointed by the secretary of health and
human services who shall have medical and physiological expertise; and 1 person appointed by
the governor who shall be a member of the public with expertise in scientific research on or
technological development in testing capabilities of these substances. A majority of the members
of the commission present and voting shall constitute a quorum. Members of the commission
shall serve without compensation.
The commission shall study (i) scientific types of testing and data; (ii) medical types of
testing and data; (iii) possible new technological forms of testing; (iv) civil liberties of the
operator; (v) social economic aspects of the testing; (vi) admissibility of evidence of impaired
driving in court proceedings; (vii) burden on law enforcement; (viii) the current status of law
within the commonwealth; (ix) training of law enforcement, including the cost of such training;
(x) intrusiveness of tests; (xi) cost analysis of testing; (xii) the current threshold for determining
impairment; (xiii) the rate of success in stopping impaired operators; and (xiv) anything else the
commission deems necessary or significant. The commission may, subject to appropriation,
incur such expenses as may be necessary to the execution of duties invested in it.
On or before January 1, biannually, the commission submit a report of its findings and
any recommendations for legislation to the governor, the house and senate chairs of the joint
of 3

committee on the judiciary, the house and senate chairs of the joint committee on public safety
and homeland security, the clerks of the house of representatives and the senate, and the chief
justice of the trial court; provided, however, that the commission may submit additional periodic
reports as, in its discretion, it determines to be necessary. The first biennial report of the
commission shall be submitted not later than January 1, 2026.
of 3